Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-403
Code; persons subject to.

The following persons are subject to this code: All members of the military forces of Nebraska not in the active service of the United States and who are under orders to be in the active service of the state as defined by section 55-104.

Laws 1969, c. 458, § 3, p. 1554.